Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-194
Uniformity of application and construction.

(RULLCA 1101) In applying
and construing this uniform act, consideration must be given to the need to
promote uniformity of the law with respect to its subject matter among states
that enact it.

Laws 2010, LB888, § 94.